Utah statutes.
41-12a-503.   Conditions to license, registration, and privilege renewal.
The license, registration, and nonresident's operating privilege suspended
under Subsection 41-12a-501(3) remain suspended and may not be renewed nor may
that license or registration be issued until one of the following is
satisfied:
(1)  The person deposits or has deposited on his behalf the post-accident
security required under Subsection 41-12a-501(1).
(2)  One year has elapsed following the effective date of the suspension and
evidence satisfactory to the department has been filed that during that period
no action for damages arising out of the accident has been commenced.
(3)  Evidence satisfactory to the department has been filed with it of a
release from liability, of a final adjudication of nonliability, or of a duly
acknowledged written agreement providing for the payment of an agreed amount
in installments with respect to all claims for injuries or damages resulting
from the accident.  In the event of default in the payment of any installment
under such an agreement, upon receiving notice of the default, the department
shall suspend the license and registration or nonresident's operating
privilege of the person defaulting.  This license, registration, or
nonresident's operating privilege may not be restored until either:
(a)  The person deposits and thereafter maintains security as required under
Subsection 41-12a-501(1).
(b)  One year has elapsed following the date when the security was required
and during that period no action upon the agreement has been instituted in a
Utah court.
